Alaska, session 34, HB373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 37.13.120(c) is amended to read: 06 (c) The board shall invest at least 25 percent of fund assets in a stock 07 market index that tracks the stock performance of 500 companies listed on stock 08 exchanges in the United States selected primarily based on stock market 09 capitalization [MAINTAIN A REASONABLE DIVERSIFICATION AMONG 10 INVESTMENTS UNLESS, UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES, IT IS CLEARLY 11 PRUDENT NOT TO DO SO. THE BOARD SHALL INVEST THE ASSETS OF 12 THE FUND IN IN-STATE INVESTMENTS TO THE EXTENT THAT IN-STATE 13 INVESTMENTS ARE AVAILABLE AND IF THE IN-STATE INVESTMENTS 14 (1) HAVE A RISK LEVEL AND EXPECTED RETURN 01 COMPARABLE TO ALTERNATE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITIES; AND 02 (2) ARE ELIGIBLE FOR INVESTMENT OF FUND ASSETS 03 UNDER (a) OF THIS SECTION]. 04 * Sec. 2. AS 37.13.206(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) The board may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter 06 [AND SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS UNDER AS 37.13.120(a)]. The provisions 07 of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) regarding the adoption of regulations do 08 not apply to regulations of the corporation. 09 * Sec. 3. AS 37.13.120(a) and 37.13.120(e) are repealed. 10 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.